Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2093.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 15-701.03, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE15-701.03. Health education instruction; mental health instruction In adopting the course of study and competency requirements pursuant to sections 15-701 and 15-701.01, the state board of education shall require that all health education instruction include mental health instruction.  Mental health instruction may be included in a health course or another existing course and shall incorporate the multiple dimensions of health by including mental health and the relationship of physical and mental health to enhance student understanding, social and emotional learning, attitudes and behavior that promote health and well-being. In adopting the mental health instruction requirement, the state board of education shall consult with the following: 1. Mental health experts, including representatives from the department of health services. 2. Mental health advocacy organizations that are based in this state. 3. The department of education. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Delayed repeal Section 15-701.03, Arizona Revised Statutes, as amended by this act, is repealed from and after December 31, 2036.